Hawaii, session 2026, HB1781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Hawaii Numeracy Act. SECTION 2.  The legislature finds that mathematics proficiency is essential for college and career readiness, economic mobility, and a strong future workforce for the State. Yet statewide math outcomes show persistent gaps in foundational numeracy skills.  According to the 2024 National Assessment of Educational Progress, only forty-two per cent of Hawaii's fourth-grade students and twenty-three percent of eighth-grade students scored at or above proficient in mathematics, meaning that a majority of students are not meeting grade-level expectations. The legislature further finds that other states have demonstrated that rapid, measurable improvement in student math achievement is possible when schools implement structured, evidence-based mathematics coaching.  Alabama and Kentucky, both early adopters of statewide math coaching models, posted some of the strongest gains in the nation on recent National Assessment of Educational Progress assessments.  Alabama's sustained investment in math coaches contributed to some of the largest fourth-grade math increases nationally in 2022 and continued improvements in 2024. Kentucky's statewide coaching model has similarly been associated with notable gains in elementary mathematics achievement and steady improvement across student subgroups.  These examples show that high-quality, job-embedded instructional coaching can help teachers implement evidence-based math instruction, strengthen early numeracy, and accelerate statewide gains. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a comprehensive numeracy coaching program in Hawaii to support teachers, improve instruction, and ensure that all students develop a strong foundation in mathematics. SECTION 3.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  numeracy coaching program "§302A-     Definitions.  As used in this subpart, unless the context otherwise requires: "Dyscalculia" means a pattern of learning difficulties characterized by problems processing numerical informational, learning arithmetic facts, performing accurate or fluent calculations, difficulties with mathematical reasoning, and difficulties with word reasoning accuracy. "Numeracy" means the ability to understand and work with numbers. §302A-     Numeracy coaching program; established.  (a)  The department shall establish a statewide numeracy coaching program to strengthen mathematics instruction and improve student outcomes in numeracy and mathematics. (b) The department shall employ and allocate numeracy coaches to department schools with priority given to: (1)  Elementary schools serving kindergarten through fifth grade, where early numeracy development has the greatest long-term impact; (2)  Schools with the lowest mathematics proficiency rates, as determined by state assessments and the National Assessment of Educational Progress; and (3)  Middle schools and intermediate schools serving the eighth grade, where statewide mathematics proficiency remains significantly below grade-level expectations. (c) The department shall ensure that the deployment of numeracy coaches reflect statewide needs and school-level data, with staffing decisions grounded in student performance, demonstrated demand for instructional support, and equitable access across complex areas. §302A-     Numeracy coach; qualifications.  To qualify as a numeracy coach, an individual shall: (1)  Hold a valid teacher license issued by the Hawaii teacher standards board; (2)  Have at least three years of successful experience teaching mathematics or providing mathematics intervention at the elementary school, middle school, or intermediate school level; (3)  Demonstrate expertise in mathematics and numeracy instruction through at least one of the following: (A)  A mathematics or elementary mathematics specialist endorsement; (B)  Passing a high-quality mathematics assessment approved by the department; or (C)  Completion of a department-approved mathematics coaching preparation program; and (4)  Complete department-approved professional learning in evidence-based mathematics instruction, numeracy development, and instructional coaching. §302A-     Numeracy coaches; duties and responsibilities.  Numeracy coaches shall support the improvement of mathematics instruction and student learning through evidence-based coaching practices.  The duties of numeracy coaches shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Providing job-embedded instructional coaching to teachers, including modeling lessons, co-teaching, observation with feedback, and collaborative planning; (2)  Supporting teachers in implementing evidence-based mathematics and numeracy practices that are aligned with state standards, including practices that strengthen number sense, conceptual understanding, procedural fluency, and problem-solving; (3)  Assisting teachers in the use of screening, diagnostic, and formative assessment tools to identify student needs, including characteristics of dyscalculia, and to monitor student progress in mathematics; (4)  Facilitating ongoing professional learning for teachers and grade-level teams that build knowledge of mathematics content, the progression of numeracy development, and effective instructional strategies; (5)  Collaborating with school leadership to support a coherent schoolwide mathematics improvement plan aligned with complex-area and statewide goals; (6)  Supporting the use of high-quality instructional materials and interventions, including concrete, visual, and representational tools that improve mathematics learning; (7)  Using student performance data to inform instructional adjustments, intervention supports, and small-group instruction across all tiers of the school's multi-tiered system of support for mathematics; (8)  Participating in ongoing professional learning and coach training as required by the department to ensure consistent statewide coaching quality; and (9)  Engaging families and the school community in strategies that support numeracy development outside the classroom, as appropriate. §302A-     Report. No later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature on the status of the numeracy coaching program. The report shall include: (1)  Student mathematics proficiency and growth on state assessments and the National Assessment of Educational Progress, disaggregated by subgroup; (2)  The number of teachers receiving coaching cycles and the type and duration of coaching provided; (3)  Progress-monitoring data for numeracy in grades kindergarten through five; (4)  Workforce data related to the numeracy coaching program, including coach recruitment, retention, licensure pathways, and whether coaches are hired from within schools or from outside the department; (5)  Teacher feedback on the effectiveness of numeracy coaching support; and (6)  Recommendations for improving the numeracy coaching program and any additional resource needs. §302A-     Rules.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate this subpart." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the numeracy coaching program pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________